Illinois, session 104th, HB5063.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Charter 5School Closure Financial Accountability Law. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds and 7declares all of the following: 8        (1) Public funds and public property provided to 9    charter schools must be protected and used for students' 10    education. 11        (2) Charter schools in this State may close during a 12    school year, and when they do there is a risk that 13    students, employees, and public assets will suffer harm 14    while the charter operator faces no meaningful financial 15    accountability. 16        (3) Current law and administrative guidance address 17    closure procedures but do not uniformly require a 18    prefunded financial mechanism sufficient to cover 19    transition costs, severance, and the return of publicly 20    funded property. 21        (4) It is, therefore, necessary to require charter 22    operators to maintain closure reserves, require return of 23    public assets purchased with public funds, provide   HB5063- 2 -LRB104 18287 LNS 31727 b1    remedies to recover costs incurred by authorizers and 2    students' home districts, and impose penalties for 3    mid-year abandonment that is negligent or in bad faith. 4    Section 10. The School Code is amended by changing Section 527A-3 and by adding Sections 27A-9.5, 27A-10.15, and 27A-10.20 6as follows: 7    (105 ILCS 5/27A-3)8    Sec. 27A-3. Definitions. For purposes of this Article:9    "At-risk pupil" means a pupil who, because of physical, 10emotional, socioeconomic, or cultural factors, is less likely 11to succeed in a conventional educational environment.12    "Authorizer" means an entity authorized under this Article 13to review applications, decide whether to approve or reject 14applications, enter into charter contracts with applicants, 15oversee charter schools, and decide whether to renew, not 16renew, or revoke a charter.17    "Closure event" means any termination, revocation, 18nonrenewal, or voluntary cessation of operations of a charter 19school resulting in the charter school's permanent cessation 20of instruction to enrolled pupils outside the normal 21end-of-school-year phase-out.22    "Closure security" means a financial instrument listed 23under subsection (a) of Section 27A-10.15.24    "Financial distress" means one or more of the following   HB5063- 3 -LRB104 18287 LNS 31727 b1conditions, as determined by an authorizer based on documented 2evidence:3        (1) failure to timely meet payroll, benefits, or other 4    operating obligations;5        (2) material audit findings indicating insolvency, 6    negative cash flow, or substantial doubt as to a charter 7    school's ability to continue as a going concern;8        (3) default or imminent default on debt or lease 9    obligations;10        (4) failure to maintain required closure security or 11    other financial reserves required under this Article;12        (5) evidence of misuse or misappropriation of public 13    funds; or14        (6) any financial condition that poses an imminent 15    risk to the continued operation of a charter school or to 16    the orderly transition of enrolled pupils.17    "Financial intervention" means a temporary, limited 18assumption of financial oversight authority by an authorizer 19for the purpose of stabilizing a charter school and protecting 20students, employees, and public assets. 21    "Local school board" means the duly elected or appointed 22school board or board of education of a public school 23district, including special charter districts and school 24districts located in cities having a population of more than 25500,000, organized under the laws of this State.26    "Public assets" means equipment, furniture, books,   HB5063- 4 -LRB104 18287 LNS 31727 b1instructional technology, real estate, or any other real 2property purchased or leased with public funds or purchased 3with funds subject to public oversight. 4    "State Board" means the State Board of Education.5    "Union neutrality clause" means a provision whereby a 6charter school agrees: (1) to be neutral regarding the 7unionization of any of its employees, such that the charter 8school will not at any time express a position on the matter of 9whether its employees will be unionized and such that the 10charter school will not threaten, intimidate, discriminate 11against, retaliate against, or take any adverse action against 12any employees based on their decision to support or oppose 13union representation; (2) to provide any bona fide labor 14organization access at reasonable times to areas in which the 15charter school's employees work for the purpose of meeting 16with employees to discuss their right to representation, 17employment rights under the law, and terms and conditions of 18employment; and (3) that union recognition shall be through a 19majority card check verified by a neutral third-party 20arbitrator mutually selected by the charter school and the 21bona fide labor organization through alternate striking from a 22panel of arbitrators provided by the Federal Mediation and 23Conciliation Service. As used in this definition, "bona fide 24labor organization" means a labor organization recognized 25under the National Labor Relations Act or the Illinois 26Educational Labor Relations Act. As used in this definition,   HB5063- 5 -LRB104 18287 LNS 31727 b1"employees" means non-represented, non-management, and 2non-confidential employees of a charter school. 3(Source: P.A. 103-175, eff. 6-30-23; 103-416, eff. 8-4-23; 4103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 5    (105 ILCS 5/27A-9.5 new)6    Sec. 27A-9.5. Charter renewal; timely execution; funding 7consequences.8    (a) This Section applies to all charter renewals approved 9on or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 10104th General Assembly.11    (b) Upon approval of a charter renewal by an authorizer, 12the charter operator shall execute the renewal agreement no 13later than 90 days after the date of the authorizer's final 14renewal approval.15    (c) Failure of a charter operator to execute an approved 16renewal agreement within the 90-day period shall constitute:17        (1) a refusal of the renewal by the charter operator; 18    and19        (2) a nonrenewal of the charter for all purposes under 20    this Article, without further action required by the 21    authorizer.22    (d) A charter school that is deemed nonrenewed under 23subsection (c) is ineligible to receive any payments from a 24school district, including a school district organized under 25Article 34, after the expiration of the existing charter term,   HB5063- 6 -LRB104 18287 LNS 31727 b1including, but not limited to:2        (1) per-pupil tuition or payments;3        (2) supplemental, categorical, or grant funding 4    administered by the district; and5        (3) any pass-through or discretionary funds controlled 6    by the district.7    The school district shall cease payments upon expiration 8of the charter term if a renewal agreement has not been 9executed as required by subsection (b).10    (e) A charter operator's refusal to execute a renewal 11agreement under subsection (b) due to disagreement with the 12terms approved by the authorizer, including labor-related, 13governance, or accountability provisions, may not delay, toll, 14or suspend the 90-day execution requirement under subsection 15(b) or the funding consequences under subsection (d).16    (f) A charter operator that fails to execute a renewal 17agreement within the period specified in subsection (b) may 18not continue to operate the charter school beyond the 19expiration of the existing charter term and is subject to the 20closure procedures under this Article.21    (g) At the time an authorizer grants approval of a charter 22renewal, the authorizer shall provide written notice to the 23charter operator of the execution deadline under subsection 24(b) and the funding consequences of a failure to execute under 25subsection (d).26    (h) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to impair   HB5063- 7 -LRB104 18287 LNS 31727 b1the rights of employees or labor organizations under the 2Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act. 3    (105 ILCS 5/27A-10.15 new)4    Sec. 27A-10.15. Closure financial accountability.5    (a) Every charter operator shall maintain, while its 6charter is in effect, one or more of the following financial 7instruments to secure closure obligations:8        (1) an escrow account held in a financial institution 9    in this State in the name of the charter school, funded in 10    cash;11        (2) a surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit 12    issued by a financial institution authorized to do 13    business in this State; or14        (3) a segregated reserve fund reflected on the charter 15    school's audited financial statements and held in a manner 16    acceptable to the authorizer and the State Board.17    A charter school in operation on the effective date of 18this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly must comply 19with this Section within 2 fiscal years after the effective 20date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 21    (b) The closure security under subsection (a) for a 22charter school in operation for at least one fiscal year must 23equal 3 months of the charter school's average operating 24expenditures based on its last audited fiscal year. If the 25closure security is below the required amount, the authorizer   HB5063- 8 -LRB104 18287 LNS 31727 b1shall require a remediation plan to reach compliance within 2 2fiscal years. Failure to timely comply is grounds for 3suspension of enrollment growth and may be considered in a 4charter renewal determination.5    For a charter school in operation for less than one fiscal 6year, the closure security must equal 3 months of the charter 7school's projected annual budget, as approved by the charter's 8authorizer. The closure security for such a charter school 9must be established and funded to at least 50% of the required 10amount, based on the charter school's projected budget, at the 11time the charter is granted or, for a charter granted before 12the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 13Assembly, within 30 days after the effective date of this 14amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly and must reach 15the full required amount by the end of the charter's second 16full fiscal year.17    (c) Closure security shall be used, in priority order, to 18pay: 19        (1) the direct costs of transitioning students, such 20    as transportation, records transfer, and student placement 21    assistance, incurred by the authorizer or receiving school 22    district;23        (2) any outstanding payroll for employees for time 24    worked through the closure date, including legally 25    required benefits, and severance if contractually required 26    under the charter school's collective bargaining   HB5063- 9 -LRB104 18287 LNS 31727 b1    agreements or employment contracts;2        (3) any costs reasonably incurred for the storage or 3    transfer of student records and special education 4    documents required to ensure continuity of services;5        (4) any costs to return public assets to the 6    authorizer or otherwise account for disposition of public 7    assets purchased with public funds; and8        (5) any reasonable administrative costs incurred by 9    the authorizer or the State Board to supervise and execute 10    the closure and student transition.11    Closure security may not be used to pay any preexisting, 12unrelated debt of the charter operator that is not connected 13to the operating obligations to students, employees, or public 14property, except as permitted under this subsection. 15    (d) A charter operator must provide the authorizer and the 16State Board written notice of the charter operator's intent to 17close a charter school no fewer than 90 days before the planned 18closure and must provide immediate notice upon any involuntary 19closure action, insolvency event, or cessation of operations.20    Within 30 days after a closure event, the authorizer shall 21publish a closure action statement that lists amounts from the 22closure security disbursed and the uses.23    (e) Failure to maintain closure security as required under 24this Section is a basis for: 25        (1) the authorizer to withhold a portion of per-pupil 26    payments until compliance is achieved; and  HB5063- 10 -LRB104 18287 LNS 31727 b1        (2) consideration in denying a charter renewal or 2    revoking the charter or ineligibility to operate 3    additional charter campuses.4    If the closure security is insufficient to cover the costs 5of a closure event as set forth in subsection (c), the 6authorizer or the State Board may: 7        (1) bring a civil action against the charter operator 8    to recover the unpaid amounts; and9        (2) seek to impose a lien on any property owned by the 10    charter operator that is located in this State to secure 11    recovery. 12    In cases in which a closure results from gross negligence, 13willful misconduct, or intentional misappropriation of public 14funds by the charter operator or its officers or directors, 15the authorizer or State Board may seek recovery from 16individual officers, directors, or persons who knowingly 17caused the gross negligence, willful misconduct, or 18intentional misappropriation, including civil penalties not to 19exceed $50,000 per violation and reasonable attorney's fees.20    (f) Upon closure, any public assets purchased with public 21funds must be returned to the authorizer or disposed of 22according to procedures established by the State Board or the 23authorizer. Proceeds from any sale of such assets shall be 24applied first to outstanding obligations to students and 25employees, and then to the reimbursement of public funds.26    (g) The State Board shall adopt rules to implement this   HB5063- 11 -LRB104 18287 LNS 31727 b1Section within 180 days after the effective date of this 2amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, including 3acceptable forms of closure security, procedures for claims on 4closure security, and documentation standards for authorizers 5to approve closure security.  6    (105 ILCS 5/27A-10.20 new)7    Sec. 27A-10.20. Financial distress; charter school 8financial intervention.9    (a) If an authorizer determines that a charter school is 10in financial distress, the authorizer may require the charter 11operator to submit a financial remediation plan for approval 12within 30 days after that determination. The remediation plan 13shall include, at a minimum:14        (1) current cash-flow projections;15        (2) corrective actions to address identified 16    deficiencies;17        (3) a timeline for achieving fiscal stability; and18        (4) enhanced financial-reporting requirements as 19    specified by the authorizer.20    Failure to timely submit a remediation plan or implement 21an approved remediation plan constitutes grounds for financial 22intervention under subsection (b).23    (b) If the authorizer determines that (i) the charter 24school has failed to implement an approved remediation plan or 25(2) the financial distress presents an immediate risk to   HB5063- 12 -LRB104 18287 LNS 31727 b1students, employees, or public funds, the authorizer may 2initiate financial intervention by appointing an independent 3fiscal manager approved by the authorizer and the State Board.4    (c) The fiscal manager may exercise authority, limited to 5financial matters, over the charter school, including:6        (1) approval and oversight of expenditures and 7    disbursements;8        (2) oversight of payroll, benefits, and required 9    employee payments;10        (3) reviewing, modifying, or terminating any vendor 11    contracts necessary to ensure fiscal stability;12        (4) protection, inventory, and preservation of public 13    assets; and14        (5) ensuring compliance with financial reporting and 15    audit requirements.16    The fiscal manager may not exercise authority over 17curriculum, instruction, educational programming, or personnel 18matters unrelated to financial administration.19    (d) Financial intervention under this Section is temporary 20and may not exceed 180 days, except that the authorizer may 21extend the intervention once for good cause. The intervention 22shall terminate upon a determination by the authorizer that 23fiscal stability has been restored or upon charter revocation, 24surrender, nonrenewal, or closure.25    (e) Prior to initiating financial intervention, the 26authorizer shall provide written notice to the charter   HB5063- 13 -LRB104 18287 LNS 31727 b1operator describing the basis for the intervention and provide 2an opportunity to respond, except in cases in which immediate 3action is required to protect students or public funds.4    (f) An authorizer's exercise of authority under this 5Section:6        (1) does not constitute operation or management of the 7    charter school;8        (2) does not create financial or legal liability for 9    the authorizer or its members; and10        (3) shall be deemed an oversight and regulatory 11    function for purposes of immunity under Section 27A-7.10.12    (g) Financial intervention under this Section does not 13preclude charter revocation, nonrenewal, or closure and may be 14used to stabilize operations pending an orderly closure 15pursuant to this Article. 16    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 17severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.